Tennessee statutes. Title 60 Oil And Gas
Part 5

Mineral Test Hole Regulatory Act

60-1-501. Short title.

This part shall be known and may be cited as the “Mineral Test Hole Regulatory Act.”

Acts 1982, ch. 654, § 4.

Law Reviews.

Into the Fracking Fray: A Balanced Approach to Regulating Hydraulic Fracturing in Tennessee, 44 U. Mem. L. Rev. 667 (2014).

60-1-502. Purpose.

The purpose of this part is to:

Regulate the drilling of mineral test holes in order to prevent the pollution of potable water resources, both surface and subsurface, as the result of the introduction of undesirable substances, including natural brines, oil, gas, or mineralized waters through the process of the drilling of mineral test holes; and

Provide basic geologic data to the state relating to oil, gas and water occurrences.

Acts 1982, ch. 654, § 4.

60-1-503. Part definitions. [See contingent amendment to subdivisions (1) and (9)(D) and the Compiler’s Notes.]

As used in this part, unless the context otherwise requires:

[Current version. See second version for contingent amendment and Compiler's Notes.]

“Board” means the Tennessee board of water quality, oil and gas;

[Contingent amendment. See the Compiler's Notes.]

“For exploratory purposes” means drilling of mineral test holes for the specific purpose of exploring for mineral resources;

“Mineral” means any substance with economic value whether organic or inorganic that can be extracted from the earth, but excluding oil and gas;

“Mineral test hole” means any hole in excess of one hundred feet (100') drilled during the exploration for minerals but excludes auger drilling in surficial or otherwise unconsolidated material, drilling in conjunction with mining or quarrying operations, drill holes for the exploration of oil and/or gas, water, structural foundations, and seismic surveys;

“Natural brine” means naturally occurring mineralized water other than potable or fresh water;

“Operator” means the person, whether owner or not, supervising or responsible for drilling, operating, repairing, abandoning or plugging of mineral test holes subject to this part;

“Owner” means the person who has or attains the right to drill, convert or operate any mineral test hole subject to this part;

“Person” means any individual, corporation, company, association, joint venture, partnership, receiver, trustee, guardian, executor, administrator, personal representative or private organization of any kind;

“Pollution” means such alteration of the physical, chemical, biological, bacteriological, or radiological properties of the waters, soils, animal, fish and aquatic life or surface property of this state as will:

Result or will likely result in harm, potential harm, or detriment to the public health, safety, or welfare;

Result or will likely result in harm, potential harm, or detriment to the health of animals, birds, fish, or aquatic life;

Render or will likely render the waters, soils, animal, fish and aquatic life or surface property substantially less useful for domestic, municipal, industrial, agricultural, recreational, or other reasonable uses; or

[Current version. See second version for contingent amendment and Compiler's Notes.]

Leave or will likely leave the waters in such condition as to violate any standards of water quality established by the Tennessee board of water quality, oil and gas; and

[Contingent amendment. See the Compiler's Notes.]

Leave or will likely leave the waters in such condition as to violate any standards of water quality established by the Tennessee board of energy and natural resources, created by § 69-3-104; and

“Supervisor” means the commissioner or the commissioner's designee.

“Board” means the Tennessee board of energy and natural resources, created by § 69-3-104;

Acts 1982, ch. 654, § 4; 1992, ch. 693, § 23; 2018, ch. 839, §§ 17, 18.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2012, ch. 986, § 29 substituted “Tennessee board of water quality, oil, and gas” for “oil and gas board”.

The former water quality control board, formerly referred to in this section, was terminated by Acts 2012, ch. 986, § 26, and its responsibilities were transferred to the Tennessee board of water quality, oil, and gas, created by § 69-3-104.

Acts 2018, ch. 839, § 44 provided that the governor shall take all action necessary to prepare and submit for approval all necessary requests for federal grant funding and applications for authorization to the appropriate federal authority to obtain exclusive jurisdiction over surface coal mining and reclamation operations and the maximum federal money available for those purposes in an expeditious manner.

Acts 2018, ch. 839, § 45 provided that the commissioner of environment and conservation shall notify the secretary of state and the executive secretary of the Tennessee code commission of the date this state has been approved to exercise primacy over the regulation of surface coal mining and reclamation operations within its territorial boundaries.

Acts 2018, ch. 839, § 47 provided that the act, which amended this section, shall take effect, including for purposes of rulemaking, upon the deposit of federal funds in the Coal Mining Protection Fund.

Amendments. The 2018 amendment substituted “board of energy and natural resources, created by § 69-3-104” for “board of water quality, oil and gas” in the definition of “board” and in (D) of the definition of “pollution”. See the Compiler’s Notes.

Effective Dates. Acts 2018, ch. 839, § 47. [See Compiler's Notes.]

60-1-504. Administration of part — Powers of supervisor.

The supervisor shall administer and enforce this part.

The supervisor shall exercise the following powers to:

Adopt rules and regulations necessary for the implementation of this part in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5;

Make inspections of drilling operations and require the keeping of accurate records;

Require that the location, drilling, deepening, reworking, reopening, casing and plugging of mineral test holes subject to this part be accomplished in a manner which prevents surface and underground pollution;

Require on all mineral test holes the keeping of data and the filing of such data with the supervisor which are appropriate to the purposes of this chapter. Oil, gas and hydrologic data obtained from the drilling of mineral test holes are deemed appropriate to the purposes of this part. This information shall be held confidential by the supervisor for a period of six (6) months at the request of the operator;

Release to the board for meetings and hearings only data which are necessary to the administration of this part;

Order by written notice, the immediate suspension or prompt correction of any operation, condition, or practice found to exist which is causing or resulting in, or threatening to cause or result in, surface or underground pollution. Orders shall remain in force until cancelled by the supervisor, or modified by the board, or the courts;

Require the filing of adequate surety or security bonds and to provide for the release thereof;

Qualify persons for blanket permits; and

Bring proceedings at law or in equity for the enforcement of this part and rules, regulations or orders promulgated thereunder in the circuit or chancery court of the county in which a violation is alleged to have occurred.

Acts 1982, ch. 654, § 4; 2007, ch. 362, § 10.

Cross-References. Confidentiality of public records, § 10-7-504.

60-1-505. Permit required — Fees.

A person shall not drill a mineral test hole for exploratory purposes until the owner, directly or through the owner's authorized representative, files a written application for a permit to drill, files an approved surety or security bond, and receives a permit in accordance with the rules of the supervisor. A fee shall be submitted with the application in an amount to be set in rules to be promulgated by the supervisor not to exceed the amount stated in § 68-203-103(h) for a mineral test hole permit fee. Within ten (10) days after receiving the application and fee, the supervisor shall issue or deny the permit. No permit shall be issued to any owner or owner's authorized representative who is in violation of this part or any rules promulgated thereunder.

Upon request, the supervisor may issue a blanket permit to qualified persons to drill mineral test holes within a limited or local area where an extensive drilling exploration program is planned.

All information pertaining to the application for and issuance of permits for mineral test holes subject to this part shall be held confidential.

Acts 1982, ch. 654, § 4; 2007, ch. 362, §§ 11, 12.

Cross-References. Confidentiality of public records, § 10-7-504.

60-1-506. Application of Administrative Procedures Act.

All administrative functions, proceedings and duties of the board relating to this part shall be subject to and conducted in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.

Acts 1982, ch. 654, § 4.

60-1-507. Supervisor to correct problems upon failure of owner, operator or surety.

Whenever the supervisor has determined that an owner or operator has failed or neglected to drill, case, operate, repair or plug a mineral test hole in accordance with this part or the rules or orders adopted hereunder, notice of the determination shall be given to the owner or operator and to the surety executing the bond filed by such owner or operator, along with an order to correct the problem. If the owner or operator, or surety, fails to correct the specified conditions in accordance with the rule or order of the supervisor within sixty (60) days after service of notice, the supervisor may enter into or upon any private or public property on which the well is located, and across any private or public property to reach the mineral test hole, and repair or correct the specified condition, and the owner, operator and surety shall be jointly and severally liable for all expenses incurred. The supervisor shall certify to the owner, operator and surety the claim of the state, listing therein the items of expense in making the repair or correction. The claims shall be paid by the owner or operator, or surety, within thirty (30) days, and, if not paid within that time, the supervisor may bring suit in the circuit or chancery court against the owner, operator and surety, jointly and severally, for the collection.

Acts 1982, ch. 654, § 4.

60-1-508. Actions prohibited.

It is unlawful for any person to:

Violate any of this part or any rule or order of the supervisor or board;

Make false entry or statement in any required report or record;

Omit or cause to be omitted from any required report or record full, true and correct entries as required by this part;

Fail in providing, within a reasonable time, a copy of any report or record requested by the supervisor; and

Cause surface or subsurface pollution in the drilling, operation, or plugging of mineral test holes subject to this part.

Acts 1982, ch. 654, § 4.

60-1-509. Civil and criminal penalties.

Any person or operator who violates any of this part or regulations adopted pursuant thereto, or who fails to perform the duties imposed by these provisions or who fails or refuses to obtain a permit as provided herein, or who violates any determination or order promulgated pursuant to this part is liable to a civil penalty of not less than one hundred dollars ($100) nor more than one thousand dollars ($1,000) for each day during which such violation continues, and, in addition, may be enjoined from continuing such violation as hereinafter provided. The penalties shall be assessed and subject to appeal in accordance with § 60-1-401.

It shall be the duty of the district attorneys general in the various judicial districts throughout the state, or the attorney general and reporter, upon the request of the supervisor, to bring an action for the recovery of the penalties herein provided for and to bring an action for a restraining order, temporary or permanent injunction, against any operator or other person violating or threatening to violate any of this part or violating or threatening to violate any order or determination promulgated pursuant to this part.

Any person who willfully and knowingly falsifies any records, information, plans, specifications, or other data required by the board or the supervisor or who willfully fails, neglects, or refuses to comply with any of this part is guilty of a Class C misdemeanor; provided, that no process by warrant, presentment or indictment shall be issued except upon application of the board or commissioner or such application for process authorized by them.

Nothing in this part shall abrogate the right of any person who is materially or personally damaged or injured by the drilling of a mineral test hole to seek remedies against the responsible person in the courts.

Acts 1982, ch. 654, § 4; 1989, ch. 591, § 113; 2007, ch. 362, § 13.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class C misdemeanor, § 40-35-111.

60-1-510. Injunctions.

When there is reason to believe that a person is violating or is about to violate or has violated any of this part or any permits or orders issued thereunder, the supervisor may institute proceedings in the chancery court of the county in which the alleged violation occurred for injunctive relief to prevent continuance of such action or to correct the conditions resulting in or about to result therefrom, or both. The court shall grant the injunction without the necessity of showing a lack of adequate remedy at law upon a showing by the supervisor that such person is violating or is about to violate or has violated one (1) or more of the permanent or temporary injunctions, prohibitory or mandatory, and restraining orders.

The supervisor may bring suit for injunctive enforcement of any order made by the supervisor when such order has become final as a result of any person's failure to appeal to the board, and such person has failed to comply with the order. In such suits all findings of fact contained in the order and complaint shall be deemed to be final, and not subject to review except as to receipt of notice of the order, but the defendant may proffer evidence showing that the defendant has in fact complied with the supervisor's order. The order made by the supervisor in such cases shall be prima facie reasonable and valid, and it shall be presumed that the supervisor has complied with all requirements of the law. The board may likewise bring suit for enforcement of any order made by it, which has become final either by failure of any person to appeal the board's order or by an appellate court's decision against any person who fails to comply with such final order. In such suits, the board's decision shall not be subject to challenge as to matters of law or fact, but the violator may proffer evidence showing that the violator has in fact complied with the board's order.

Any suit for an injunction brought by the supervisor shall be filed in the chancery court of the county in which all or a part of the violation is or is about to occur, in the name of the department, by the district attorney general at the direction of the supervisor or the board and under the supervision of the attorney general and reporter. Such proceedings shall not be tried by jury. Appeals from judgments or decrees of the chancery court in proceedings brought under this part shall lie to the supreme court despite the fact that controverted questions of fact may be involved.

Acts 1982, ch. 654, § 4.

60-1-511. Part supplemental.

This part shall not operate to repeal or affect any of the laws of the state relating to the pollution of the air or waters thereof, or any conservation or mining laws, but shall be held and construed as ancillary and supplemental thereto.

Acts 1982, ch. 654, § 4.